test/src/gt-norm-yamls/vep-test-V-pestas_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - pestas: # Verb '/(eng) to wash oneself /(fin) peseytyä' - full paradigm
     pestas+V+Der/da+Inf: pestas
#     pestas+V+Der/des+Inf+Ine: pestes
#     pestas+V+Der/den+Inf+EssInst: pesten
#     pestas+V+Der/ma+Inf+Ill: pezmha
#     pestas+V+Der/ma+Inf+Ine: pezmas
#     pestas+V+Der/ma+Inf+Ela: pezmaspäi
#     pestas+V+Der/ma+Inf+Ade: pezmal
     pestas+V+Ind+Prs+RcSg1: pezemoi
     pestas+V+Ind+Prs+RcSg2: pezetoi
     pestas+V+Ind+Prs+RcSg3: pezese
     pestas+V+Ind+Prs+RcPl1: pezemoiš
     pestas+V+Ind+Prs+RcPl2: pezetoiš
     pestas+V+Ind+Prs+RcPl3: pezese
     pestas+V+Ind+Prs+Rc+ConNeg+Sg: peste
     pestas+V+Ind+Prs+Rc+ConNeg+Pl: peskoiš

     pestas+V+Ind+Prt+RcSg1: pezimoi
     pestas+V+Ind+Prt+RcSg2: pezitoi
     pestas+V+Ind+Prt+RcSg3: pezihe
     pestas+V+Ind+Prt+RcPl1: pezimoiš
     pestas+V+Ind+Prt+RcPl2: pezitoiš
     pestas+V+Ind+Prt+RcPl3: pezihe
     pestas+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+RcSg: peznus
     pestas+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+RcPl: peznus
     pestas+V+Ind+PrfPrc+RcSg: peznus
     pestas+V+Ind+PrfPrc+RcPl: peznus

     pestas+V+Imprt+RcSg2: peste
     pestas+V+Imprt+RcSg3: peskahas
     pestas+V+Imprt+RcPl1: peskamoiš
     pestas+V+Imprt+RcPl2: peskatoiš
     pestas+V+Imprt+RcPl3: peskahas
     pestas+V+Imprt+ConNeg+RcSg2: peste
     pestas+V+Imprt+ConNeg+RcSg3: peskoiš
     pestas+V+Imprt+ConNeg+RcPl: peskoiš

     pestas+V+Cond+Prs+RcSg1: pezižimoi
     pestas+V+Cond+Prs+RcSg2: pezižitoi
     pestas+V+Cond+Prs+RcSg3: pezižihe
     pestas+V+Cond+Prs+RcPl1: pezižimoiš
     pestas+V+Cond+Prs+RcPl2: pezižitoiš
     pestas+V+Cond+Prs+RcPl3: pezižihe
     pestas+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg+RcSg: pezižihe
     pestas+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg+RcPl: pezižihe

     pestas+V+Cond+Prt+RcSg1: peznuižimoi
     pestas+V+Cond+Prt+RcSg2: peznuižitoi
     pestas+V+Cond+Prt+RcSg3: peznuižihe
     pestas+V+Cond+Prt+RcPl1: peznuižimoiš
     pestas+V+Cond+Prt+RcPl2: peznuižitoiš
     pestas+V+Cond+Prt+RcPl3: peznuižihe
     pestas+V+Cond+Prt+ConNeg+RcSg: peznuižihe
     pestas+V+Cond+Prt+ConNeg+RcPl: peznuižihe
